Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2359.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 508. Nondisclosure agreements.(a) Prohibition.--(1) An agency may not enter into an agreement with a <--123456789101112131415161718 person concerning the construction, development or location of a data center, which requires confidentiality, nondisclosure or otherwise restricts the agency from disclosing information to members of the public.(2) An agreement or contract, or a provision of an agreement or contract, entered into after the effective date of this section in violation of paragraph (1) is deemed contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "data center" shall mean a facility, campus of facilities or array of interconnected facilities that is used by a business entity or other enterprise to operate, manage or maintain a computer, group of computers or other organized assembly of hardware and software for the primary purpose of processing, storing, retrieving or transmitting data.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.AMENDING THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), ENTITLED "AN ACT RELATING TO TAX REFORM AND STATE TAXATION BY CODIFYING AND ENUMERATING CERTAIN SUBJECTS OF TAXATION AND IMPOSING TAXES THEREON; PROVIDING PROCEDURES FOR THE PAYMENT, COLLECTION, ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT THEREOF; PROVIDING FOR TAX CREDITS IN CERTAIN CASES; CONFERRING POWERS AND IMPOSING DUTIES UPON THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, CERTAIN EMPLOYERS, FIDUCIARIES, INDIVIDUALS, PERSONS, CORPORATIONS AND OTHER ENTITIES; PRESCRIBING CRIMES, OFFENSES AND PENALTIES," IN COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAM, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR DEFINITIONS, FOR APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION, FOR ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO SALES AND USE TAX REFUND PROGRAM, FOR NOTIFICATION, FOR ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION PROGRAM AND FOR NOTIFICATION AND RECORDS.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. SECTION 2901-D OF THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:20260HB2359PN3684 - 2 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536 SECTION 2901-D. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"AGENCY." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 102 OF THE ACT OF FEBRUARY 14, 2008 (P.L.6, NO.3), KNOWN AS THE RIGHT-TO-KNOW LAW.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 2912-D(3) AND (4) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 2912-D. APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION.TO BE CONSIDERED FOR A CERTIFICATION, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT AN APPLICATION ON A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING:* * *(3) IF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS TO QUALIFY UNDER SECTION [2915-D(1)] 2915-D(A)(1), THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:(I) THE ANTICIPATED INVESTMENT ASSOCIATED WITH THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR WHICH THE CERTIFICATION IS BEING SOUGHT.(II) AN AFFIRMATION, SIGNED BY AN AUTHORIZED EXECUTIVE REPRESENTING THE OWNER OR OPERATOR, THAT THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS EXPECTED TO SATISFY THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION [2915-D(1)] 2915-D(A)(1).(4) IF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS TO QUALIFY UNDER SECTION [2915-D(2)] 2915-D(A)(2), AN AFFIRMATION, SIGNED BY AN AUTHORIZED EXECUTIVE REPRESENTING THE OWNER OR OPERATOR, THAT THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER HAS SATISFIED, OR WILL SATISFY, THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION [2915-20260HB2359PN3684 - 3 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 D(2)] 29 15-D(A)(2) .(4.1) IF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER IS TO QUALIFY UNDER SECTION 291 5-D(B) AND (C), AN AFFIRMATION, SIGNED BY AN AUTHORIZED EXECUTIVE REPRESENTING THE OWNER OR OPERATOR, THAT THE OWNER O R OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER HAS SATISFIED, OR WILL SATISFY, THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED UNDER SECTION 2915-D(B) AND (C). EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UN DER SECTION 2915-D(D), IN ORDER TO RETAIN A CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTE R DATA CENTER SHALL ANNUALLY SUBMIT THE REQUIRED FOOTPRINT R EPORT UNDER SECTION 2915-D(B) TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT REFLEC TS ANY UPDATES TO THE OPERATIONS OF THE FACILITY. * * *SECTION 3. SECTIONS 2915-D INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND 2916-D(A) HEADING OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTIONS ARE AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 2915-D. ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS.(A) REQU IREMENTS.-- A COMPUTER DATA CENTER MUST MEET ONE OF THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS, AFTER TAKING INTO ACCOUNT THE COMBINED INVESTMENTS MADE AND ANNUAL COMPENSATION PAID BY THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER OR THE QUALIFIED TENANT:* * *(B) COMMUNITY PROTECTIONS.--ON OR BEFORE THE FIRST ANNIVER SARY OF CERTIFICATION, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTE R DATA CENTER MUST COMPLETE A COMMUNITY PROTECTION PLAN THAT ID ENTIFIES THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION: (1) THE NAME, ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF THE ENTITY OR E NTITIES THAT OCCUPY THE COMMERCIAL DATA CENTER DURING ITS OPER ATIONS. 20260HB2359PN3684 - 4 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) DOCUMENTATION THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR AUTH ORIZED REPRESENTATIVE HAS PERFORMED ALL OF THE FOLLOWING PRIO R TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE COMMERCIAL DATA CENTER: (I) PROVIDED NOTIFICATION TO THE MUNICIPALITY OR MUNI CIPALITIES IN WHICH THE FACILITY IS PROPOSED TO BE LOCA TED. (II) HELD AT LEAST ONE PUBLIC MEETING TO RECEIVE INPU T FROM COMMUNITY MEMBERS OF THE MUNICIPALITY OR MUNI CIPALITIES IN WHICH THE FACILITY IS PROPOSED TO BE LOCA TED, INCLUDING ALL MEASURES UNDERTAKEN TO ENSURE THAT THE PUBLIC MEETINGS WERE CONVENIENT AND ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBL IC. (III) CONSULTED WITH EACH CHIEF ELECTED OFFICIAL OF THE MUNICIPALITY OR MUNICIPALITIES OR THE OFFICIAL'S DESI GNEE TO DISCUSS THE PROPOSED FACILITY AND ELEMENTS OF THE PROJECT DESIGN THAT MAY IMPACT THE COMMUNITY. (3) A PROJECT FOOTPRINT REPORT, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWIN G: (I) THE TOTAL SIZE OF THE FACILITY MEASURED IN SQUA RE FEET. (II) ANY PLANS OR MEASURES UNDERTAKEN TO GENERATE ELEC TRICITY ON-SITE OR OFF-SITE TO REDUCE IMPACTS ON THE ELEC TRIC GRID. (III) ESTIMATED AVERAGE ENERGY CONSUMPTION PER HOUR DURI NG THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER'S PEAK DEMAND, INCLUDING THE SOURCE OR SOURCES OF ELECTRIC SUPPLY. (IV) ESTIMATED DAILY, MONTHLY AND ANNUAL MAXIMUM WATE R CONSUMPTION, INCLUDING THE DISCHARGE RATES AND VOLU MES, WATER SOURCE AND PURPOSE OF CONSUMPTION. (V) ANTICIPATED AVERAGE ANNUAL POWER USAGE 20260HB2359PN3684 - 5 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EFFE CTIVENESS, CALCULATED BY DIVIDING THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ELEC TRICITY CONSUMED FROM THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER BY THE ELEC TRICITY USED TO OPERATE THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUI PMENT. (VI) ANTICIPATED AVERAGE ANNUAL WATER USAGE EFFE CTIVENESS, CALCULATED BY DIVIDING THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF WATE R CONSUMED FROM THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER BY THE KILO WATT HOURS OF ELECTRICITY USED TO OPERATE THE COMP UTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT. (C) NON DISCLOSURE AGREEMENTS.--ON OR BEFORE THE FIRST ANNIVERSARY OF CERTIFICATION, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DA TA CENTER MUST CERTIFY THAT AN AGREEMENT HAS NOT BEEN ENTERED INT O, OR WILL NOT BE ENTERED INTO, WITH AN AGENCY, OR ANY ENTITY ACTING ON BEHALF OF AN AGENCY, THAT RELATES TO THE CONSTRUCTIO N, DEVELOPMENT OR LOCATION OF THE FACILITY AND REQUIRES CO NFIDENTIALITY, NONDISCLOSURE OR OTHERWISE RESTRICTS THE AGENCY FROM DISCLOSING INFORMATION TO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC. (D) APP LICABILITY.-- (1) THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) SHALL NOT APPL Y TO A COMPUTER DATA CENTER WITH A PEAK ELECTRIC DEMAND O F LESS THAN 10 MEGAWATTS. (2) SUBSECTION (B)(2) SHALL NOT APPLY TO A COMMERCIAL DATA CEN TER THAT HAS COMMENCED CONSTRUCTION PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIV E DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION. (3) SUBSECTION (C) SHALL NOT APPLY TO AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT HOLDING A CERTIFICATION UNDER THIS SUB ARTICLE PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTI ON. SECTION 2916-D. NOTIFICATION.(A) [REQUIREMENTS] INVESTMENT AND COMPENSATION REQUIREMENTS 20260HB2359PN3684 - 6 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SATISFIED.--ON OR BEFORE THE FOURTH ANNIVERSARY OF THE CERTIFICATION OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN WRITING WHETHER THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR WHICH THE CERTIFICATION IS REQUESTED HAS SATISFIED THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 2915-D.(A.1) OTHER REQUIREMENTS SATISFIED.--ON OR BEFORE THE FIRST ANNIVERSARY OF CERTIFICATION OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN WRITING WHETHER THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR WHICH THE CERTIFICATION IS REQUESTED HAS SATISFIED THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SECTION 2915-D(B) AND (C).* * *SECTION 4. SECTION 2935-D(A) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING PARAGRAPHS AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 2935-D. ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS.(A) GENERAL RULE.--IN ORDER TO BE CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER MUST MEET ALL OF THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:* * *(3) ON OR BEFORE THE FIRST ANNIVERSARY OF CERTIFICATION, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER MUST COMPLETE A COMMUNITY PROTECTION PLAN THAT IDENTIFIES THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:(I) THE NAME OF THE ENTITY OR ENTITIES THAT OCCUPY THE COMMERCIAL DATA CENTER DURING ITS OPERATIONS.(II) DOCUMENTATION THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OR AUTH ORIZED REPRESENTATIVE HAS PERFORMED ALL OF THE FOLL OWING PRIOR TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE COMMERCIAL 20260HB2359PN3684 - 7 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DATA CENTER: (A) PROVIDED NOTIFICATION TO THE MUNICIPALITY OR MUNI CIPALITIES IN WHICH THE FACILITY IS PROPOSED TO BE L OCATED. (B) HELD AT LEAST ONE PUBLIC MEETING TO RECEIVE INPU T FROM COMMUNITY MEMBERS OF THE MUNICIPALITY OR MUNI CIPALITIES IN WHICH THE FACILITY IS PROPOSED TO BE L OCATED, INCLUDING ALL MEASURES UNDERTAKEN TO ENSU RE THAT THE PUBLIC MEETINGS WERE CONVENIENT AND ACCE SSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC. (C) CONSULTED WITH EACH CHIEF ELECTED OFFICIAL OF T HE MUNICIPALITY OR MUNICIPALITIES OR THE OFFI CIAL'S DESIGNEE TO DISCUSS THE PROPOSED FACILITY AND ELEMENTS OF THE PROJECT DESIGN THAT MAY IMPACT THE COMMUNITY. (III ) A PROJECT FOOTPRINT REPORT, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING: (A) THE TOTAL SIZE OF THE FACILITY MEASURED IN SQUA RE FEET. (B) ANY PLANS OR MEASURES UNDERTAKEN TO GENERATE ELEC TRICITY ON-SITE OR OFF-SITE TO REDUCE IMPACTS ON THE ELECTRIC GRID. (C) ESTIMATED AVERAGE ENERGY CONSUMPTION PER HOUR DURING THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER'S PEAK DEMAND, INCL UDING THE SOURCE OR SOURCES OF ELECTRIC SUPPLY. (D) ESTIMATED DAILY, MONTHLY AND ANNUAL MAXIMUM WATE R CONSUMPTION, INCLUDING THE DISCHARGE RATES AND VOLU MES, WATER SOURCE AND PURPOSE OF CONSUMPTION. (E) ANTICIPATED AVERAGE ANNUAL POWER USAGE EFFE CTIVENESS, CALCULATED BY DIVIDING THE TOTAL 20260HB2359PN3684 - 8 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AMOU NT OF ELECTRICITY CONSUMED FROM THE COMPUTER DATA CENT ER BY THE ELECTRICITY USED TO OPERATE THE COMP UTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT. (F) ANTICIPATED AVERAGE ANNUAL WATER USAGE EFFE CTIVENESS, CALCULATED BY DIVIDING THE TOTAL AMOU NT OF WATER CONSUMED FROM THE COMPUTER DATA CENT ER BY THE KILOWATT HOURS OF ELECTRICITY USED TO OPER ATE THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER EQUIPMENT. (4) ON OR BEFORE THE FIRST ANNIVERSARY OF CERTIFICATION, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER MUST CERTIFY THAT AN AGREEMENT HAS NOT BEEN ENTERED INTO, OR WILL NOT BE ENTERED INTO, WITH AN AGENCY, OR ANY ENTITY ACTING ON BEHALF OF AN AGENCY, THAT RELATES TO THE CONSTRUCTION, DEVELOPMENT OR LOCATION OF THE FACILITY AND REQUIRES CONFIDENTIALITY, NONDISCLOSURE OR OTHERWISE RESTRICTS THE AGENCY FROM DISCLOSING INFORMATION TO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC.(A.1) APPLICABILITY.--(1) THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) AND (4) SHALL NOT APPLY TO A COMPUTER DATA CENTER WITH A PEAK ELECTRIC DEMAND OF LESS THAN 10 MEGAWATTS.(2) SUBSECTION (A)(3)(II) SHALL NOT APPLY TO A COMMERCIAL DATA CENTER THAT HAS COMMENCED CONSTRUCTION PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.(3) SUBSECTION (A)(4) SHALL NOT APPLY TO AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OR QUALIFIED TENANT HOLDING A CERTIFICATION UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.* * *SECTION 5. SECTION 2936-D(A) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:20260HB2359PN3684 - 9 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 2936-D. NOTIFICATION AND RECORDS.(A) [REQUIREMENTS] INVESTMENT AND COMPENSATION REQUIREMENTS SATISFIED.--ON OR BEFORE THE FOURTH ANNIVERSARY OF THE CERTIFICATION OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN WRITING WHETHER THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR WHICH THE CERTIFICATION IS REQUESTED HAS SATISFIED THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED UNDER SECTION 2935-D(A).(A.1) OTHER REQUIREMENTS SATISFIED.--(1) ON OR BEFORE THE FIRST ANNIVERSARY OF THE CERTIFICATION OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT IN WRITING WHETHER THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER FOR WHICH THE CERTIFICATION IS REQUESTED HAS SATISFIED THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED UNDER SECTION 2935-D(3) AND (4).( 2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 2935-D(A.1), IN ORDER TO RE TAIN A CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SUBARTICLE, THE OWNER OR OPERA TOR OF THE COMPUTER DATA CENTER SHALL ANNUALLY SUBMIT THE R EQUIRED FOOTPRINT REPORT UNDER SECTION 2935-D(A)(3)(III) TO TH E DEPARTMENT THAT REFLECTS ANY UPDATES TO THE OPERATIONS OF TH E FACILITY. * * *SECTION 6. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20260HB2359PN3684 - 10 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄1234567891011121314151617181920212223